Florida, session 2026, SB1318.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 8 9 Section 1.âParagraphs (g) and (h) of subsection (11) of 10 section 1002.395, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 11 1002.395âFlorida Tax Credit Scholarship Program.â 12 (11)âSCHOLARSHIP AMOUNT AND PAYMENT.â 13 (g)âReimbursements for program expenditures may continue 14 until the account balance is expended or remaining funds have 15 reverted to the state. 16 (h)âA studentâs scholarship account must be closed and any 17 remaining funds shall revert to the state after: 18 1.âDenial or revocation of program eligibility by the 19 commissioner for fraud or abuse, including, but not limited to, 20 the student or studentâs parent accepting any payment, refund, 21 or rebate, in any manner, from a provider of any services 22 received pursuant to paragraph (6)(d); 23 2.âTwo consecutive fiscal years in which an account has 24 been inactive; or 25 3.âThe student remains unenrolled in an eligible private 26 school for 30 days while receiving a scholarship that requires 27 full-time enrollment. 28 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.